Tennessee, session 114, HB1123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 24-5-113(a)(3), is amended by
deleting the language "four thousand dollars ($4,000)" and substituting "twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1123
002180
- 1 -